Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB543.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5504.1. Masked intimidation.(a) Offense defined.--A person is guilty of masked intimidation if the person intentionally harasses, intimidates or threatens any other person or group of persons while hiding or concealing the person's face with a mask or other article or device worn for the primary purpose of placing the other person or group of persons in reasonable fear for their physical safety.(b) Application.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to a person wearing a mask or otherwise covering one's face for a purpose 123456789101112131415161718 other than a purpose specified in subsection (a), in cases where the person is:(1) Wearing a mask or face covering on or near the occasion of a holiday, celebration or other event involving costumes.(2) Wearing a mask, hood, article or other device for the purpose of ensuring the physical safety of the wearer or because of the nature of the person's occupation, trade or profession.(3) Wearing a mask, hood, article or other device for the purpose of protection from the weather elements or while participating in a winter sport.(4) Wearing a mask, hood, article or other device in an artistic or theatrical production or celebration.(5) Wearing a gas mask or other protective facial covering for the purpose of protection during or related to an emergency situation, or during emergency management drills.(6) Wearing a mask for the purpose of ensuring one's physical health and safety or the health and safety of others, including the limitation of the spread of airborne illnesses.(7) Wearing garb for religious purposes, so long as the person is not also wearing a mask or concealing the person's face for the primary purpose described in subsection (a).(c) Grading.--An offense under this section is a misdemeanor of the third degree.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or infringe upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.20250SB0543PN0561 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Harass." To engage in a knowing and willful pattern of conduct directed at a particular person or particular group of persons that is intended to cause that person or that group of persons to reasonably fear for their safety or suffer substantial emotional distress."Intimidate." To willfully and substantially interfere with, by threats, intimidation or coercion, the exercise or enjoyment by another person of rights secured by the Constitution or laws of the United States, or the Constitution or laws of this Commonwealth, because of that person's actual or perceived race, color, religion, national origin, ethnicity, sex, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation or disability."Threaten." To communicate a clear intention to cause imminent bodily harm to another person or group of persons.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0543PN0561 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718